Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 4. County Clerks

Cross references. —

As to appointment of clerk by commissioners in connection with the formation of a new county, see §

18-1-306

.

As to salary of county clerk, see §

18-3-107

.

For duty of county clerk to notify county attorney of appeal from board of commissioners on disallowance of claim, see §

18-3-513

.

For duty of county clerk to endorse a certificate upon viaduct and subway bonds, see §

18-4-406

.

As to hours of labor for state and county employees, see §

27-5-101

.

For authority of county clerks and deputies to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Court § 1 et seq.; 56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 90, 91, 235; 66 Am. Jur. 2d Records and Recording Laws §§ 1 to 81.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 97 to 142.

§ 18-3-401.
Office created; election.

There shall be elected in each county a county clerk, who shall be a resident of the county in which the county clerk serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county clerk serves.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 54, § 1; 1895, ch. 73, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1136; C.S. 1910, § 1237; C.S. 1920, § 1484; R.S. 1931, § 30-501; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 27-701; W.S. 1957, § 18-118; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added ", who shall be a resident of the county in which the county clerk serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county clerk serves."

Editor's notes. —

The office of county clerk was originally created by ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

Chapter 85, Laws 1937, consisting of 13 sections, was a general law providing for the terms and election of county officers. Sections 1 (assessor) and 9 (elections) were repealed by § 3, ch. 164, Laws 1945, and § 21, ch. 127, Laws 1951, respectively. For the remaining sections appearing herein see the Table of Disposition of Acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 165, § 2, provides: "The residency requirements of this act shall apply to elected or appointed county officers whose terms commence on or after the effective date of this act."

Allegation of malfeasance insufficient. —

Allegation at close of an indictment that a defendant county clerk “was then and there unlawfully and corruptly guilty of malfeasance” is insufficient. McCarthy v. Territory, 1 Wyo. 311,

1876 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1876).

Nature of duties imposed by law. —

When duties are imposed upon a public officer, such as a county clerk, by law rather than by some appointing power, such duties are usually governmental and not ministerial. Denver Buick v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970).

When county clerk's bond protects; ministerial duties. —

A county clerk's bond protects if the official misappropriates public funds, because there would be no immunity in such a case. It also protects when a county clerk or his deputies default in the performance of ministerial duties. A duty is ministerial when the law prescribes the mode and occasion of its performance with such certainty that nothing is left to judgment or discretion — a duty not involving official discretion. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

The issuance of a certificate of title

to a motor vehicle by a county clerk is a governmental function. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

The county clerk is cloaked with governmental immunity

in the performance of such a duty. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

Bonding company not liable if principal is immune from suit. —

There is no authority in this state for holding a county clerk's bonding company liable for an act or default of the county clerk when the county clerk is immune from suit. It would be an anomaly to hold the bonding company liable if its principal is not liable. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

Liability on county clerk's bond. —

There can be no liability on a county clerk's bond unless the county clerk is liable for some default. In the absence of a statute imposing liability, a clerk is not liable for defaults or negligent acts of himself or deputies in the performance of governmental duties imposed by statute. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of county clerk or prothonotary, or surety on bond, for negligent or wrongful acts of deputies or assistants, 71 ALR2d 1140.

§ 18-3-402.
Duties generally.

The county clerk shall:

Act as clerk to the board of county commissioners and as such shall:

Attend all sessions of the board of county commissioners either in person or by deputy;

Keep the seal, records and papers of the board of county commissioners;

Keep a record of all proceedings of the board;

Make regular entries of all the board’s resolutions, orders and decisions in all questions coming before it;

Sign all orders issued by the board for the payment of money and preserve and file all accounts acted upon by the board with a memorandum of its action thereon;

Perform other duties as required by the board of county commissioners.

Keep a record of all licenses, except marriage licenses, giving the names of the persons to whom such licenses are issued with the date, amount and purpose for which the license was issued;

Keep blank county warrants or blank orders which shall be properly filled out before any warrants are delivered. He shall not deliver any warrant until it is properly signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners, countersigned by the county treasurer and attested by himself with the county seal;

Keep a seal provided by the board of county commissioners, the impression, ink stamp or digital equivalent of which shall contain the words “The State of Wyoming, County Clerk”, together with the name of the county;

Designate upon every account audited and allowed the amount allowed and file such accounts as well as those not allowed in separate accounts. He shall not sign or issue any county warrants unless ordered by the board of county commissioners. He shall number each warrant issued;

Have custody and keep all books, records, deeds, maps, papers and copies thereof deposited or kept in his office as required by law. All deeds, mortgages, and other instruments in writing authorized by law to be recorded or filed in his office and left in his office shall be:

Recorded in distinct handwriting or by typing, photostating, photographing, printing or other reproduction, either in whole or in part, in suitable books; or

Recorded on microfilm, microcards or other permanent record retention medium. All reproduction processes shall be instituted and used pursuant to W.S.

9-2-413

. Maps may either be recorded as herein provided or if the copying is unlikely to provide a satisfactory record, the county clerk may keep the originals or tracings thereof, undamaged and unfolded and make prints available for public use.

Record any deed containing a metes and bounds description which may be accompanied by a map prepared in compliance with law and delineating the land described in the deed. If a map delineating the land has been previously recorded, the deed may make reference to the recorded map;

Require any person presenting a document for recording which is legible but not sufficiently clear to produce a readable copy to substitute a clear original or legible true copy of the original document;

Keep in his office a general index, direct and inverted, in which he shall make correct entries of every instrument recorded or filed under appropriate headings, entering the names of the grantors and grantees in alphabetical order. He shall make correct entries in the index of every instrument required by law to be entered therein. He shall immediately note in the appropriate index whenever any mortgage, bond or other instrument has been released or discharged from record, whether by written release or by recording a deed of release;

Keep a record specifying the time of reception, the names of the grantors, the names of the grantees, from whom received, to whom delivered and the fees received:

Whenever any instrument is received for recording, immediately endorse upon the instrument his certificate, noting the day, hour and minute of its reception, the reference where recorded, the fees received for recording and date of record;

The date of record of all instruments requiring recording or filing shall be the date of filing;

Whenever any instrument has been filed the county clerk shall immediately make an entry of the same, and after the instrument requiring recording is recorded he shall immediately deliver it to the person authorized to receive it;

No county clerk shall perform any of these duties unless any required fee has been paid.

Keep abstract records in which all transfers and mortgages of real property and all liens upon real estate are briefly entered. All instruments affecting real estate and left for record or filed in the office shall be abstracted against all lands described in the instrument either directly or by reference to another properly recorded instrument as soon as practicable in the order in which received:

The county clerk shall enter in the abstract all recorded transfers of real estate and all mortgages, construction liens and judgment liens;

All abstract entries of land shall describe the legal division of land or subdivision, naming section, township and range according to the United States surveys when the same is described in the instrument filed for record. The abstract entries shall include:

The name of the grantor or grantee;

The name of the mortgagor or mortgagee or the parties thereto;

The character of the instrument;

The consideration stated in the instrument;

The date of the instrument;

The date of filing in the clerk’s office;

The description of the premises;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 3, § 2.

All abstract entries of town lots shall be made in a similar manner to those of lands and shall reference the number of the lot and block.

File or file and record every notice, abstract or statement of any lien or claim or release or discharge thereof in favor of the United States or any department or bureau thereof as provided by the laws of the United States when any such instrument has been prepared in conformity to the laws of the United States and is presented for filing or filing and recording:

The county clerk shall number such notices, abstracts or statements in the order in which they are filed and if they are required to be recorded he shall record them in accordance with subparagraph (xi)(B) of this subsection, with the character of the instrument being called “federal lien”;

No fee shall be charged for the performance of these services and the failure to file, record or index properly the notice, abstract or statement shall not affect the validity or legality of any such lien, claim, release or discharge.

Accept and use as official records, when furnished to him without charge, records containing printed forms of water right contracts, forms for subscription to the stock of corporations or associations whereby water rights are acquired and forms of deeds of water rights from all corporations and water user associations organized for constructing, maintaining or operating ditches, reservoirs or other water works for irrigation, mining, milling or power purposes;

Issue certificates under the seal of the county relating to the selection or relinquishment of state or school lands required by the state board of land commissioners without requiring the payment of fees:

At the request of the state board of land commissioners the county clerk shall record and abstract all contracts between the United States and the state of Wyoming. All deeds, relinquishments or assignments executed by the authority of the state board of land commissioners shall be executed under his seal without requiring the payment of fees.

Endorse a certificate upon every bond or evidence of debt issued pursuant to law that the same is within the lawful debt limit of the county and is issued according to law. Such certificates shall be signed in his official character;

Collect and remit to the county treasurer the following fees:

Recording charges for any instrument — first page . . . . . $12.00

Each additional page
. . . . . $3.00

Abstract of personal property (per year) . . . . . $1.00

Acknowledgments . . . . . $2.00

Bond oath and notary public commission — first page . . . . . $12.00

Each additional page
. . . . . $3.00

Military discharge and separation papers

(first recording) . . . . .
No Charge

Marriage license . . . . . $30.00

Marriage license certified copy . . . . . $5.00

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 96, § 2.

Certification . . . . . $5.00

State tax liens . . . . . $20.00

(L)

Release of state tax liens
. . . . .
INCLUDED IN FILING FEE

Additional recording charge for any instrument with more than five (5)

grantors or grantees of a different surname or more than five (5) claim names — each

additional name
. . . . . $1.00

Additional recording charge for each section (including quarter and quarter-quarter, if applicable), block, lot or tract —

description in excess of ten (10)
. . . . . $1.00

Plats filed (including cemeteries and amended plats) . . . . . $75.00

Liens filed pursuant to Title 29 — first page . . . . . $12.00

Each additional page
. . . . . $3.00

Filing charge for each corner record or certificate . . . . . $5.00

Recording charge for any instrument containing more than

two (2) real estate descriptions by book and page only — each

additional description
. . . . . $2.00

Liens filed upon real property pursuant to W.S. 20-6-106(y) . . . . . $12.00

Each additional page
. . . . . $3.00

Additional recording charge for each additional collateral description
. . . . . $1.00

For filing and indexing an original financing and termination statement . . . . . $20.00

For each additional certificate of title upon which

the lien is note for perfection
. . . . . $1.00

For statements of amendment, continuation or assignment . . . . . $5.00

For lien search and certification of filings of record and affixing the seal . . . . . $20.00

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Permit any person authorized by the board of county commissioners of any new county or of any bonded abstract company, and at the expense of the new county or abstract company, to examine the records of all deeds, mortgages, maps and other instruments which affect any property located within the boundaries of the new county, and to transcribe,photograph or reproduce the same:

The county clerk shall compare the transcribed,photographed or reproduced instruments in his office and shall certify to the county clerk of the new county or the abstract company that they are true and correct copies of the originals. The county clerk certifying the instruments shall not receive any additional payment for time spent in comparing and certifying the instruments. All expenses shall be paid by the new county;

The county clerk of the new county or the bonded abstract company shall index and abstract all transcribed,photographed or reproduced instruments in accordance with paragraphs (vi) through (xii) of this subsection which shall be received in evidence and have the same effect as if they had been originally filed in the new county.

Deliver upon the written demand of the county clerk of any new county all records containing abstracts of lands in townships lying wholly within the boundaries of the new county and all records containing abstracts of townsites and town lots lying wholly within the boundaries of the new county together with the plats of the townsites or town lots. When the county clerk of the new county has received the records and abstracts they shall become a part of the records of the new county and no further abstracts of the instruments are required;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 34, § 2.

Deliver to his successor in office all books, records, papers and other items belonging to his office;

Remit all monies coming into his office to the county treasurer;

Perform other duties as prescribed by law, as county clerk and register of deeds;

Perform all duties or general accounting required to implement the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act [§§

16-4-101

to

16-4-124

];

File maps as defined in W.S.

33-29-801

. The county clerk shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for filing the maps;

If the county clerk accepts electronic recordings of deeds, mortgages, conveyances, patents, certificates, instruments and other like documents, establish procedures to govern the electronic recordings consistent with rules promulgated by the department of enterprise technology services pursuant to W.S.

34-1-405

.

No individual, corporation or governmental entity is exempt from payment of fees in advance.

A county clerk may charge a reasonable fee for a copy or a reproduction of a public record, but the fee shall not exceed the actual cost of duplication of the record. As used in this subsection, “actual cost of duplication” means the cost of materials and supplies used to duplicate or reproduce the record, but shall not include the cost of labor or the overhead associated with the duplication.

Each county clerk shall, after receiving a proposed budget for a special district or other specified entity under W.S. 9-1-507(a)(viii), ensure that the proposed budget is forwarded to the board of county commissioners and county assessor.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 90, § 59; 1890-91, ch. 43, § 1; ch. 54, §§ 2 to 7, 9 to 13, 15; 1895, ch. 7, § 2; ch. 76, § 15; R.S. 1899, §§ 1137, 1141 to 1146, 1148 to 1152, 1154 to 1156, 1215; Laws 1907, ch. 20, § 1; ch. 43, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 1127, 1238, 1242 to 1244, 1246, 1247, 1249 to 1254, 1259; Laws 1911, ch. 80, § 1; ch. 89, § 1; 1915, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1361, 1485, 1489 to 1494, 1497, 1499 to 1501, 1503 to 1505, 1507 to 1509; Laws 1925, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-101, 30-502, 30-507 to 30-512, 30-514, 30-515, 30-517 to 30-519, 30-521 to 30-523, 30-525 to 30-527, 118-114, 118-115; Laws 1939, ch. 71, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-702 to 27-707, 27-709 to 27-713, 27-715, 27-716, 27-718 to 27-725; Laws 1949, ch. 117 § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-119 to 18-125, 18-127 to 18-131, 18-134, 18-143; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1978, ch. 14, § 1; 1980, ch. 49, § 2; 1981, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 91, § 1; Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 23, § 1; 1989, ch. 44, § 1; 1991, ch. 107, § 1; 1993, ch. 192, § 1; 1995, ch. 158, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 96, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206; 2010, ch. 34, § 2; ch. 69, § 204; 2013 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 60, § 2, effective January 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 3, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to organization and formation of new counties generally, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

As to duty of each county officer to keep office at county seat, see §

18-3-103

.

As to removal of records for purposes of copying see §

18-3-103

.

For provision that clerk shall be furnished office, see §

18-3-103

.

As to copies of instruments filed in office of clerk and transcripts of records kept by clerk as evidence, see §

18-3-104

.

For duty of county commissioners to provide county officers with stationery and supplies, see §

18-3-514

.

As to preparation of list of qualified trial jurors in new counties, see §

1-11-128

.

As to certificates of honorable discharge from military service of the United States being recorded by clerk without fee, see §

19-14-104

.

For provision requiring county clerk to record marriages in a book to be kept for that purpose, see §

20-1-103

.

As to recording of instruments concerning real estate, see §§

34-1-118

,

34-1-119

.

As to deeds, mortgages and leases generally, see §§

34-2-101

to

34-2-135

.

As to fee for recording certificate of priority issued in connection with adjudication of water rights with county clerk, see §

41-4-325

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(vi)(B), substituted “W.S.

9-2-413

” for “W.S. 9-212.7:1”; and in (a)(xxiv), substituted “W.S. 33-29-139” for “W.S.

33-29-111

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xxii), deleted “either” preceding “as county clerk” and deleted “or as ex officio register of deeds” from the end.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 34, § 2, repealed former (a)(xix), pertaining to requirement of county clerks to compile jury list information.

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 204, effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (a)(xvi)(Y), pertaining to obsolete filing and indexing termination statements.

While neither amendment gave effect to the either, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “33-29-801” for “33-29-139” in (a)(xxiv).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(vii) substituted “five dollars ($5.00)” for “two dollars ($2.00)”; in
deleted “or the county clerk may prepare a true copy by handwriting or typewriting and attach the same to the original as part of the document for making the permanent photographic record. The county clerk shall charge a fee of fifty cents ($.50) per one hundred (100) words for preparing a true copy,” rewrote (xvi); and in (xxiv) “fifty dollars ($50.00)” and “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment

, effective January 1, 2017, added (a)(xxv).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (d).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i)(C), substituted “Keep a record of” for “Record in a book provided for that purpose”; in (a)(ii), substituted “record of” for “book in which are entered”; in (a)(iii), deleted “a book of” and “with a blank margin” and added “blank”; in (a)(iv), added “ink stamp or digital equivalent”; in (a)(vii), deleted “The county clerk shall charge a fee of five dollars ($5.00) for recording these maps”; in (a)(ix), deleted “in the proper column and opposite the entry”; in the introductory language in (a)(x), substituted “record” for “receiving book, each page of which is divided into six (6) columns,” in (a)(x)(A), substituted “reference” for “book and page”; in (a)(x)(C), deleted “writing the name of the person to whom it is delivered in the appropriate column”; in the introductory language in (a)(xi), substituted “records” for “books provided by the board of county commissioners”; in (a)(xi)(A), deleted “dark colored ink in” and “book”; in (a)(xi)(B), deleted “be made in a well bound properly ruled book which shall in the headlines” and substituted “abstract entries” for “book” and “include” for “conruled parallel columns in which shall be entered”; in (a)(xi)(C), substituted “and” for “but,” “reference” for “be in a separate book provided by the board of county commissioners and,” deleted “shall appear in the headlines”; in (a)(xii)(A), substituted “accordance with subparagraph (xi)(B) of this subsection, with the character of the instrument being called ‘federal lien’ ” for “a well bound book to be called ‘federal lien record.’ All instruments which require filing or recording shall be indexed alphabetically under the names of the persons named or affected in a well bound book called ‘index to federal liens’ ”; in (a)(xiii), substituted “records” for “record books” and “records” for “books,” added “to,” deleted “The charge for recording such instruments is ten cents ($.10) per folio of one hundred (100) words actually written in pen and ink or typewritten,” and made related changes; in the introductory language in (a)(xvii), substituted “transcribe, photograph or reproduce” for “transcribe or photograph,” and deleted “in books provided by the new county or abstract company”; in (a)(xvii)(A), in the first sentence, substituted “transcribed, photographed or reproduced” for “transcribed or photographed,” substituted “instruments” for “transcripts or photographs” and “any additional payment” for “fifty cents ($.50) per hour,” and added “not” after “shall”; in (a)(xvii)(B), deleted “in the proper books,” substituted “transcribed, photographed or reproduced” for “transcribed or photographed,” and added “in accordance with paragraphs (vi) through (xii) of this subsection”; in (a)(xviii), substituted “records” for “books of record” and “records” for “books.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(xi)(B)(VIII), which read: “Other pertinent remarks as will show the instrument was properly witnessed and acknowledged.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “$” preceding the dollar values throughout (a)(xvi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(xvi)(B), (a)(xvi)(I) or (a)(xvi)(V) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

Applicability of section. —

Former section 18-142.1 requiring county clerk to compile list of qualified jurors was not applicable to a trial held in August, 1973, following the passage and approval of the section in March, 1973, because the section did not require its mandate to be fulfilled until the following January. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Construction.—

Use of the word shall in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-6-206(a)(ii) (2017), as well as in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 18-3-402(a)(xii), means the county clerk’s recording obligation is mandatory, not discretionary. Tuttle v. Lee, 2018 WY 104, 425 P.3d 998,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2018).

Clerk authority.—

District court properly dismissed a property owner’s declaratory judgment action seeking to require a county clerk to remove a notice of federal tax lien (NFTL) from the property record where the clerk had a mandatory obligation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 29-6-206(a)(ii) and 18-3-402(a)(xii) to file the NFTL, and nothing in her general statutory authority or her authority under the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

29-6-201

et seq. (2017), permitted her to independently question the underlying validity of the NFTL, remove it from the property record, or record a document declaring it invalid. Tuttle v. Lee, 2018 WY 104, 425 P.3d 998,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2018).

Attendance at board proceedings. —

Although no detailed agenda was required for administrative meetings of board of county commissioners with its staff, county clerk was required to attend executive sessions to make minutes and preserve a record of those meetings. Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000).

Liability on county clerk's bond. —

There can be no liability on a county clerk's bond unless the county clerk is liable for some default. In the absence of a statute imposing liability, a clerk is not liable for defaults or negligent acts of himself or deputies in the performance of governmental duties imposed by statute. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

When county clerk's bond protects; ministerial duties. —

A county clerk's bond protects if the official misappropriates public funds, because there would be no immunity in such a case. It also protects when a county clerk or his deputies default in the performance of ministerial duties. A duty is ministerial when the law prescribes the mode and occasion of its performance with such certainty that nothing is left to judgment or discretion — a duty not involving official discretion. Spaniol Ford, Inc. v. Froggatt, 478 P.2d 598,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1970).

Cost of new county records. —

In an action to fix the liabilities and property between an old and a new county carved therefrom, this section was cited to the effect that there was no provision therein for apportioning the cost of the new county in securing the records. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

Rule that subsequent grantee not required to search records anterior to vesting of title in his grantor not applicable in view of this section. —

The rule that a subsequent grantee is not required to search the records in point of time anterior to the vesting of the legal title in his grantor is based on the reason that a duty should not be imposed on him of examining the records indefinitely. Such rule does not apply in this state since this section

18-3-402

requires an abstract of each and every instrument left for record, so that anyone interested in any tract of land may turn to the proper page of the abstract, and find almost at a glance, a description of every instrument, whether anterior or subsequent to the vesting of the legal title in his grantor. Balch v. Arnold, 9 Wyo. 17, 59 P. 434,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1899).

Presumption of compliance. —

Where petition in action against county alleged that plaintiff, a practicing physician, to save the life of a person who was injured, amputated his arm, and gave him proper surgical and medical attention, and that such medical and surgical attention was reasonably worth a certain sum; that plaintiff filed with the county clerk a verified claim, but that a copy of the claim was not attached to the petition, for the reason that it had been mislaid or lost, a reasonable construction of the petition showed that the account must have been presented for allowance in accordance with the statute. Board of Comm'rs v. Denebrink, 15 Wyo. 342, 89 P. 7,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1907).

Prima facie evidence. —

Original instruments on file in county clerk's office as well as copies thereof are admissible as prima facie evidence. Universal Credit Co. v. Wyoming Motor Co., 59 Wyo. 80, 136 P.2d 512,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1943).

Parol evidence permitted. —

Where this section

18-3-402

required the county clerk to record all proceedings of the county commissioners, a particular proceeding, omitted from the record, may be established by parol evidence, as the section did not make such record the only evidence of the official acts of the board. Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1898).

Applied

in

Dorador v. State, 573 P.2d 839,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1898); Appel v. State ex rel. Shutter-Cottrell, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1900); Board of County Comm'rs v. Denebrink, 15 Wyo. 342, 89 P. 7,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 14

, 9 L.R.A. (n.s.) 1234 (1907); Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1909).

Law reviews. —

For a note dealing with title examination of conveyances by strangers to title, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 119.

See comment, “Subsidence Regulations,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 543 (1971).

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

See comment, “Remedial Title Legislation for Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 561 (1972).

See “Mining Patent Application Procedure,” IX Wyo. L.J. 240.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of requirement or practice of selecting prospective jurors exclusively from list of registered voters, 80 ALR3d 869.

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
92.03 (Matthew Bender).